Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-209 Lien of warehouse. (a) A
warehouse has a lien against the bailor on the goods covered by a warehouse
receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds thereof in its possession for
charges for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal
charges, insurance, labor, or other charges, present or future, in relation to
the goods, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods or
reasonably incurred in their sale pursuant to law. If the person on whose
account the goods are held is liable for similar charges or expenses in
relation to other goods whenever deposited and it is stated in the warehouse
receipt or storage agreement that a lien is claimed for charges and expenses in
relation to other goods, the warehouse also has a lien against the goods
covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds
thereof in its possession for those charges and expenses, whether or not the
other goods have been delivered by the warehouse. However, as against a person
to which a negotiable warehouse receipt is duly negotiated, a warehouse's lien
is limited to charges in an amount or at a rate specified in the warehouse
receipt or, if no charges are so specified, to a reasonable charge for storage
of the specific goods covered by the receipt subsequent to the date of the
receipt.

(b) A warehouse may also reserve a security
interest against the bailor for the maximum amount specified on the receipt for
charges other than those specified in subsection (a), such as for money
advanced and interest. The security interest is governed by article 9.

(c) A warehouse's lien for charges and
expenses under subsection (a) or a security interest under subsection (b) is
also effective against any person that so entrusted the bailor with possession
of the goods that a pledge of them by the bailor to a good-faith purchaser for
value would have been valid. However, the lien or security interest is not
effective against a person that before issuance of a document of title had a
legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and that did not:

(1) Deliver or entrust the goods or any document of
title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor's nominee with:

(A) Actual or apparent authority to ship,
store, or sell;

(B) Power to obtain delivery under section
490:7-403; or

(C) Power of disposition under sections
490:2-403, 490:2A-304(2), 490:2A-305(2), 490:9-320, or 490:9-321(c), or other
statute or rule of law; or

(2) Acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its
nominee of any document.

(d) A warehouse's lien on household goods for
charges and expenses in relation to the goods under subsection (a) is also
effective against all persons if the depositor was the legal possessor of the
goods at the time of deposit. In this subsection, "household goods"
means furniture, furnishings, or personal effects used by the depositor in a
dwelling.

(e) A warehouse loses its lien on any goods
that it voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver. [L 2004, c
163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next